New York, session 2025-2026, S5530.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (c) of section 1621 of the vehicle and traffic 2 law, as amended by chapter 420 of the laws of 1968, is amended to read 3 as follows: 4 (c) Such department of transportation shall cause signs to be erected 5 to inform persons of the legal overhead clearance for all bridges and 6 elevated structures on highways under its jurisdiction. The legal clear- 7 ance shall be one foot less than the measured clearance. The measured 8 clearance shall be the minimum height to the bridge or structure meas- 9 ured vertically from the traveled portion of the roadway. On bridges or 10 structures having fourteen feet or more of measured clearance, no such 11 signs shall be required. The department of transportation shall cause 12 to inform and furnish to an owner or operator of trucks, commercial 13 vehicles, tractors, tractor-trailer combinations, tractor-semitrailer 14 combinations, or tractor-trailer-semitrailer combinations a list of each 15 legal clearance height for all bridges and elevated structures on high- 16 ways under its jurisdiction. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of June next succeeding 18 the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09697-01-5